Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.400

Reissuance of temporary protection orders.

(1) A temporary protection order issued under this chapter may be reissued for the following reasons:

(a) Agreement of the parties;

(b) To provide additional time to effect service of the temporary protection order on the respondent; or

(c) If the court, in writing, finds good cause to reissue the order.

(2) Any temporary orders to surrender and prohibit weapons must also be automatically reissued with the temporary protection order.

(3) To ensure that a petitioner is not delayed in receiving a hearing on a petition for a protection order, there is a rebuttable presumption that a temporary protection order should not be reissued more than once or for more than 30 days at the request of the respondent, absent agreement of the parties, good cause, or the need to provide additional time to effect service.

(4) When considering any request to stay, continue, or delay a hearing under this chapter because of the pendency of a parallel criminal investigation or prosecution of the respondent, courts shall apply a rebuttable presumption against such delay and give due recognition to the purpose of this chapter to provide victims quick and effective relief. Courts must consider on the record the following factors:

(a) The extent to which a defendant's Fifth Amendment rights are or are not implicated, given the special nature of protection order proceedings which burden a defendant's Fifth Amendment privilege substantially less than do other civil proceedings;

(b) Similarities between the civil and criminal cases;

(c) Status of the criminal case;

(d) The interests of the petitioners in proceeding expeditiously with litigation and the potential prejudice and risk to petitioners of a delay;

(e) The burden that any particular aspect of the proceeding may impose on respondents;

(f) The convenience of the court in the management of its cases and the efficient use of judicial resources;

(g) The interests of persons not parties to the civil litigation; and

(h) The interest of the public in the pending civil and criminal litigation.

(5) Courts shall not require a petitioner to complete a new confidential information form when a temporary protection order is reissued or when a full order for a fixed time period is entered, unless the petitioner indicates that the information needs to be updated or amended. The clerk shall transmit the order to the law enforcement agency identified in the order for service, along with a copy of the confidential party information form received from the respondent, if available, or the petitioner's confidential party information form to assist law enforcement in serving the order.

[ 2022 c 268 s 20; 2021 c 215 s 53.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.